Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.795

Outdoor learning grant program—Outdoor education experiences program.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the outdoor education experiences program is established as a program within the outdoor learning grant program established in RCW 28A.300.793. The purpose of the outdoor education experiences program is to develop and support outdoor learning opportunities for 5th and 6th grade students in Washington public schools, with related opportunities for high school students to volunteer as counselors. The program will consist of hands-on learning experiences that: Are three to five days in duration and up to four nights; are overnight or day programs when overnight programs are impractical due to health, cultural, or capacity considerations; and have a focus on environmental education aligned with the Washington state learning standards and the development of social and emotional learning skills.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may work with a statewide nonprofit organization representing school principals to create guidelines for the program established by this section.

(3) In implementing the program established by this section, the priority focus of the office of the superintendent of public instruction must be given to schools that have been identified for improvement through the Washington school improvement framework and communities historically underserved by science education. These communities can include, but are not limited to, federally recognized tribes, including state-tribal education compact schools, migrant students, schools with high free and reduced-price lunch populations, rural and remote schools, students in alternative learning environments, students of color, English language learner students, and students receiving special education services.

[ 2022 c 112 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 112: See note following RCW 28A.300.793.